Maryland, session 2025, SB0955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
(6) “Qualified generator lead line” means an overhead transmission line
that is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts and would allow an out–of–state
Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to interconnect with a portion of the electric system in
Maryland that is owned by an electric company.
(b) (3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection AND
SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (VI) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, unless a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the Commission, a
person may not begin construction of an overhead transmission line that is designed to
carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation with the
construction.

SENATE BILL 955 3
(ii) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (VI) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, FOR construction related to an existing overhead transmission line, the
Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for good
cause.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subject
to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line only if the
applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the overhead
transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer or an agency
of the United States.
(iv) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public convenience
and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line in the electric
distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an electric
company if:
1. the overhead transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the overhead transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
(v) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of an
overhead transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is
required under this section.
2. [On] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (VI) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, ON issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction of an overhead transmission line, a person may acquire by condemnation, in
accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or right necessary for
the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(VI) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A PERSON MAY NOT
EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION TO ACQUIRE PROPERTY ENCUMBERED BY A
CONSERVATION EASEMENT, AS DEFINED UNDER § 10–705(A) OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE, FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONSTRUCTING AN OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE.
Article – Real Property
10–705.

SENATE BILL 955
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Conservation easement” means an easement, covenant, restriction, or
condition on real property, including an amendment to an easement, covenant, restriction,
or condition, as provided for in § 2–118 of this article that is:
(i) Owned by:
1. The Maryland Environmental Trust;
2. The Maryland Historical Trust;
3. The Maryland Agricultural Land Preservation
Foundation;
4. The Maryland Department of Natural Resources;
5. A county or municipal corporation and is funded by the
Maryland Department of Natural Resources, the Rural Legacy Program, or a local
agricultural preservation program; or
6. A land trust; or
(ii) Required by a permit issued by the Department of the
Environment.
12–104.
(H) (1) THE OWNER OF PROPERTY THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL OR
AGRICULTURAL PURPOSES MAY BRING AN ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION FOR DAMAGES INCURRED AS THE RESULT OF THE VALUE OF THAT
PROPERTY BEING DIMINISHED BY THE TAKING OF ANOTHER PROPERTY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IF THE PROPERTY BEING TAKEN:
(I) IS LOCATED WITHIN 500 FEET OF THE OWNER’S PROPERTY;
AND
(II) WAS TAKEN IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE CONSTRUCTION OF
AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE OR RELATED INFRASTRUCTURE.
(2) A PROPERTY OWNER WHO BRINGS AN ACTION UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION AND IS AWARDED DAMAGES MAY ALSO SEEK, AND THE COURT MAY
AWARD, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.

SENATE BILL 955 5
(3) A PROPERTY OWNER MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON THE ENTERING OF THE FINAL DECISION IN A
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING.
12–105.
(b) (1) (I) The fair market value of property in a condemnation proceeding
is the price as of the valuation date for the highest and best use of the property which a
vendor, willing but not obligated to sell, would accept for the property, and which a
purchaser, willing but not obligated to buy, would pay, excluding any increment in value
proximately caused by the public project for which the property condemned is needed. [In
addition, fair]
(II) FAIR market value includes any amount by which the price
reflects a diminution in value occurring between the effective date of legislative authority
for the acquisition of the property and the date of actual taking if the trier of facts finds
that the diminution in value was proximately caused by the public project for which the
property condemned is needed, or by announcements or acts of the plaintiff or its officials
concerning the public project, and was beyond the reasonable control of the property owner.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A CONDEMNATION
PROCEEDING RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION
LINE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(II) IF THE FINAL DECISION IN A CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING
IS THAT THE ASSESSED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS GREATER THAN THE APPRAISED
VALUE PLACED ON THE PROPERTY BY THE CONDEMNING AUTHORITY, A
REASONABLE COUNSEL FEE FIXED BY THE TRIAL COURT SHALL BE AWARDED TO
COUNSEL FOR THE DEFENDANT AND CHARGED AGAINST THE PLAINTIFF TOGETHER
WITH THE OTHER COSTS OF THE CASE.
12–107.
(a) Any party to a condemnation case may appeal from a final judgment or
determination in the manner prescribed by the Maryland Rules.
(b) (1) If the final decision on appeal is that the plaintiff is not entitled to
condemn the property, a reasonable counsel fee fixed by the trial court shall be awarded to
counsel for the defendant and charged against the plaintiff together with the other costs of
the case.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO THE APPEAL OF A
CONDEMNATION CASE RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 955
(II) IF THE FINAL DECISION ON APPEAL IS THAT THE ASSESSED
VALUE OF THE PROPERTY IS GREATER THAN THE APPRAISED VALUE PLACED ON THE
PROPERTY BY THE CONDEMNING AUTHORITY, A REASONABLE COUNSEL FEE FIXED
BY THE TRIAL COURT SHALL BE AWARDED TO COUNSEL FOR THE DEFENDANT AND
CHARGED AGAINST THE PLAINTIFF TOGETHER WITH THE OTHER COSTS OF THE
CASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.